Florida, session 2026, HB1469.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 319.145, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
319.145 Autonomous vehicles.—
(1) An autonomous vehicle registered in this state must
meet all of the following requirements:
(a) When required by federal law:
1. Have been certified in accordance with federal
regulations in 49 C.F.R. part 567 as being in compliance with
applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards.
2. Bear the required certification label or labels
including reference to any exemption granted under applicable
federal law.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1469-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1469 2026
(b) Be capable of being operated in compliance with the
applicable traffic and motor vehicle laws of this state,
regardless of whether the vehicle is operating with the
automated driving system engaged.
(c) Comply with all federal motor vehicle standards,
regulations, and laws.
(2)(a) As used in this subsection, the term "minimal risk
condition" means a reasonably safe state, such as bringing the
vehicle to a complete stop and activating the vehicle's hazard
lamps.
(b) If the autonomous vehicle is not fully autonomous, the
vehicle must have a system to safely alert a licensed human
operator physically present in the vehicle if an automated
driving system failure is detected while the automated driving
system is engaged. When an alert is given, the system must
require the licensed human operator to take control of the
autonomous vehicle or must achieve a minimal risk condition. The
term "minimal risk condition" means a reasonably safe state,
such as bringing the vehicle to a complete stop and activating
the vehicle's hazard lamps.
(c)(3) If the autonomous vehicle is fully autonomous, it
must be able to achieve a minimal risk condition if a failure of
the automated driving system occurs which renders that system
unable to perform the entire dynamic driving task relevant to
its intended operational design domain.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1469-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1469 2026
(3)(a) An autonomous vehicle may not engage in interstate
commerce or transport passengers or goods for hire unless a
licensed human operator is physically present in the vehicle to
monitor the vehicle's performance and take control of the
vehicle if necessary.
(b) The licensed human operator must comply with all
federal and state standards, regulations, and laws relating to
autonomous vehicles and motor vehicles.
(4) Federal regulations adopted promulgated by the
National Highway Traffic Safety Administration shall supersede
this section when found to be in conflict with this section.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1469-00